Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 4

Decrees Pro Confesso

21-1-401. Original attachment — Effect of decree.

Cases in chancery brought by attachment of property under title 29, chapters 6 and 7 are governed, in respect to the effect of the decree pro confesso, by §§ 29-6-161 — 29-6-165.

Code 1858, § 4378; Shan., § 6188; Code 1932, § 10459; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-510.

Cross-References. Defendant's failure to appear; bill may be treated as confessed or defendant held in contempt, § 21-1-301.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 27; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 84.

Collateral References. Equity
417-420.

21-1-402. Time decree becomes absolute without attachment.

In all other cases, a decree against a defendant without personal service of process who does not appear to defend is not absolute for three (3) years from the decree, unless a copy of the decree is served upon the defendant, in which case it becomes absolute if the defendant fails to come forward and make defense within six (6) months after service.

Code 1858, § 4379 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1); Shan., § 6189; Code 1932, § 10460; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-511.

Cross-References. Defendant failure to appear, contempt, §§ 21-1-301 — 21-1-305.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Military, § 10; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 158.

Cited: Slawson v. Denton, 48 S.W. 350, 1898 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 88 (1898).

21-1-403. Death of defendant after decree.

The death of the defendant proceeded against without personal service, whether the death occurs before or after the filing of the bill, does not render the proceedings void, but the defendant's heirs or representatives, as the case may be, have the right, within three (3) years from the rendition of the final decree, to make themselves parties by petition, verified by affidavit, showing merits and contest the complainant's bill.

Code 1858, § 4380 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1); Shan., § 6190; Code 1932, § 10461; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-512.

Cross-References. Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

21-1-404. Time defense allowed.

The original defendant, or the defendant's heir, representative or assignee claiming under the defendant by virtue of any act done before the commencement of the suit, may, within six (6) months after service of a copy of the decree, or within three (3) years after the decree, be admitted to answer the bill, upon petition showing merits, and giving security for the payment of costs, and witnesses on both sides may be examined, and such other proceedings may be had on the suit as if the cause were then newly begun.

Code 1858, § 4381 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1); Shan., § 6191; Code 1932, § 10462; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-513.

Cross-References. Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 158.

21-1-405. Security from complainant on decree.

It is no objection to the execution of a decree rendered against a defendant that it was founded on a bill taken for confessed, without personal service; but the court may require the complainant to give sufficient security, in such sum as the court deems proper, to abide by and perform such order touching the restitution of property, or repayment of money, as the court may and should make, upon the defendant subsequently setting aside the decree, and successfully resisting the complainant's suit.

Code 1858, § 4382 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1; 1801, ch. 6, § 53); Shan., § 6192; mod. Code 1932, § 10463; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-514.

21-1-406. Effect of execution before setting aside.

The decree, if executed before it is set aside under any of the provisions of §§ 21-1-401 — 21-1-405, shall be a protection to all persons acting upon its validity, and confer a good title to all property sold under it.

Code 1858, § 4383 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 1); Shan., § 6193; Code 1932, § 10464; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-515.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 40.

Law Reviews.

Divorce Decree Taken on Pro Confesso — When It May Be Set Aside for Fraud, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 843.

Cited: Richardson v. Mitchell, 34 Tenn. App. 318, 237 S.W.2d 577, 1950 Tenn. App. LEXIS 151 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1950).